Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-303
Lien; filing; notice; requirements; effect.

Any person entitled to file a lien shall, within four months after the oil field equipment was transported and delivered, file a statement in the office of the county clerk of such county where such oil field equipment was delivered, and at the time of filing such statement the claimant shall serve a copy of the statement upon the owner thereof, or upon the trustee, agent, or receiver of any such owner by mailing a copy of such statement to the owner or to the trustee, agent, or receiver of such owner by either registered or certified mail to his or their last-known address. After the filing and service of such notice as heretofore provided, it shall be the duty of any such owner, trustee, agent, or receiver of any such owner to notify in writing any person who has a lien upon any such oil field equipment and materials before removing the same from the leasehold to which the lien claimant delivered the oil field equipment and materials. Such statement shall include the amount claimed and the items thereof described as definitely as practicable, the name of the owner, the name of the contractor, the name of the claimant, and a full description of the property subject to the lien, verified by affidavit. In the event such oil field equipment or any part thereof has been removed from the county in which it was originally delivered into another county within the state, any person entitled to file a lien as provided for in sections 57-301 to 57-304, may within thirty days after that person has received notice that such oil field equipment or any part thereof has been removed from the county in which it was originally delivered, file in the office of the county clerk of such county, a copy of the lien which has heretofore been filed in the county in which such property was originally transported and delivered. The lien provided for hereunder shall be junior to any valid and existing chattel mortgage of record.

Laws 1951, c. 185, § 3, p. 690;

Laws 1957, c. 242, § 47, p. 859;

Laws 1959, c. 260, § 1, p. 897.